Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.340

Contractors—Authority of city to verify registration and report violations.

A city that issues a business license to a person required to be registered under chapter 18.27 RCW may verify that the person is registered under chapter 18.27 RCW and report violations to the department of labor and industries. The department of revenue must conduct the verification for cities that participate in the business licensing system.

[ 2013 c 144 s 37; 2011 c 298 s 23; 2009 c 432 s 3.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.

Report—2009 c 432: See RCW 18.27.800.